Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 8

Joint Committee on Electric Utility Deregulation [Obsolete]

3-15-801 — 3-15-809. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§3-15-801 —3-15-809 (Acts 1997, ch. 531, § 13), concerning the joint committee on electric utility deregulation, is deemed obsolete due to the termination of the board on February 28, 1999.